California, session 20252026, AB484.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 6046.2 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:6046.2. (a) On or before November 30, 2026, the Committee of Bar Examiners shall provide a report to the board of trustees, the Chief Justice of the California Supreme Court, and to the Assembly and Senate Committees on Judiciary pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code on whether adopting a uniform bar examination, including, but not limited to, the National Conference of Bar Examiners’ Uniform Bar Examination or any successor or replacement of that exam, would be more efficient to administer and lower the cost of administration for the State Bar and examinees.(b) This section is repealed on January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.